Massachusetts, session 194th, H880.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Paragraph (10) of subsection (a) of section 25B of chapter 54 of the General 
Laws, as appearing in section 10 of chapter 92 of the acts of 2022, is hereby amended by 
inserting after the word “available”, the following words:- , but not mailed more than 30 calendar 
days before the date of the preliminary, primary or election that the ballot pertains to. Early 
voting ballots shall not be picked up in person from the appropriate local election official more 
than 30 calendar days before the date of the preliminary, primary or election. 
SECTION 2. Section 91B of said chapter 54, as amended by section 17 of said chapter 
92, is hereby further amended by striking out subsections (a) and (b) and inserting in place 
thereof the following subsections:- 

of 2 10    (a) Except as required by subsections (b) and (c), the ballot and accompanying 
papers shall be mailed postage prepaid and with return postage guaranteed or, if the voter so 
requests, delivered when called for at the office of the clerk, but not mailed more than 30 
calendar days before the date of the preliminary, primary or election that the ballot pertains to. 
No ballot shall be mailed to a designated health care facility within the city or town where the 
voter is registered. 
(b) To a voter who is a patient or resident at a designated health care facility, the ballot 
and accompanying papers shall be delivered, in person, by a registrar, assistant registrar or 
absent registration officer, at the designated address, but not delivered more than 30 calendar 
days before the date of the preliminary, primary or election that the ballot pertains to. For the 
purposes of this section, a “designated health care facility” shall mean a health care facility as 
defined in section 25B of chapter 111, within the city or town, which has been designated for the 
purpose of supervised absentee voting, in writing, and filed with the city or town clerk, not later 
than 28 days before a primary or election, by any 2 registrars or election commissioners.